Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1767.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 272 of Title 19, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
All county offices and courts shall offer the option to pay via
credit card for all transactions except where provided in Section
3127 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes as it states that such
real estate will be sold to the highest bidder for cash. County

ENGR. H. B. NO. 1767 Page 1

offi ces and courts shall be allowed to pass the service fee onto the
person requesting to pay via credit card.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 273 of Title 19, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
All county offices, including courts, shall be responsible for
providing any forms necessary to citizens of the county when
conducting business or legal proceedings with that county office or
court. County offices and courts may not charge a fee for providing
or printing such forms. County offices shall make all forms
necessary for citizens of the county when conducting business or
legal proceedings with that county office or court available on the
county website.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 274 of Title 19, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Every county office, including the county clerk's office,
the county treasurer's office, the county assessor's office, and the
county courthouse, shall have a notary available during business
hours.
B. The notary may not charge a fee for their services.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified in
the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 275 of Title 19, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1767 Page 2

The Office of the Attorney General shall standardize all forms
necessary for citizens when conducting business or legal proceedings
with county offices or courts. Counties shall implement the use of
the standardized forms by January 1, 2027.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
Passed the House of Representatives the 24th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate











ENGR. H. B. NO. 1767 Page 3